District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

7-1404

Health Care Safety Net Fund and Appropriations.

Repealed.

July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 6, 48 DCR 4047
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5072(b), 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9080, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5072(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).